Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-191.5] Regional state
infrastructure subaccounts. (a) The corporation, upon request by a
county, may establish and operate a regional state infrastructure subaccount
within the dwelling unit revolving fund established pursuant to section 201H-191
for the benefit of the housing and mixed-use transit-oriented development
projects within the county.

(b) Each regional state infrastructure
subaccount shall consist of the following sources of revenue:

(1) Moneys received by the corporation from counties
for the repayment of the loan principal and the payment of simple interest from
various assessments or fees from special improvement districts, improvement
districts, tax increment financing districts, community facilities districts,
and other areas where property value increases are captured over periods of
time for the purposes of infrastructure financing;

(2) Appropriations from the legislature;

(3) Federal grants and subsidies to the State or
counties;

(4) Private investments; and

(5) Voluntary contributions.

(c) The corporation shall expend revenues in
the subaccounts to make grants and loans to state agencies, and loans to
counties or private developers, for the costs, in whole or in part, of
infrastructure improvements that would increase the capacity of the
infrastructure facilities, including regional sewer systems, water systems,
drainage systems, roads, and telecommunications and broadband.

Grants and loans shall be made only for capital
improvement projects approved by the respective county council and mayor, or
state agency, as applicable, with a view towards planned growth rather than
upkeep and maintenance.

(d) Eligible costs shall include those for
planning, design, feasibility studies, construction, and materials. No grant
or loan shall be made:

(1) For maintenance or repair costs unless the
construction would simultaneously increase the carrying capacity of the
infrastructure facility; or

(2) Solely for mass transit or electrical utilities.

The corporation may also expend revenues in the
subaccounts to repay private investors for their investment plus any interest
accrued on their investments made into the subaccounts to finance, in whole or
in part, infrastructure improvements that would increase the capacity of the
infrastructure facilities, including regional sewer systems, water systems,
drainage systems, roads, and telecommunications and broadband.

(e) The corporation may accept improved land
from the counties or private developers in repayment of their loans.

(f) The corporation shall adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 91 for the purposes of this section. [L 2016, c 132, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next